dictionaries/lb/index.dic
Afrikaanscours/m1 po:noun ts:masculine_singular
aklappen/v0t0g0 po:verb
Aktiecours/m1 po:noun ts:masculine_singular
Albaneschcours/m1 po:noun ts:masculine_singular
Ambulanzcours/m1 po:noun ts:masculine_singular
ameesselen/v0t0g0 po:verb
Arbittercours/m1 po:noun ts:masculine_singular
Arteerie/m2 po:noun ts:feminine_singular
Arterie/m2 po:noun ts:feminine_singular
ascannen/v0t0g0 po:verb
aspueren/v0t0g0 po:verb
ausbréien/v0t0g0 po:verb
ausdéngen/v0t0g0 po:verb
aushaen/v3t0g0 po:verb
auskucken/v0t0g0 po:verb
auslauschteren/v0t0g0 po:verb
ausrëschten/v0t0g0 po:verb
ausschalten/v0t0g0 po:verb
Austeritéitscours/m1 po:noun ts:feminine_singular
auswanderen/v0t0g0 po:verb
auswiesselen/v0t0g0 po:verb
badgen/v0w0G0 po:verb
bäikéieren/v0t0g0 po:verb
Bakteerie/m2 po:noun ts:feminine_singular
Bakterie/m2 po:noun ts:feminine_singular
Bankeclient/f8s0m1 po:noun ts:masculine_singular
Basiscours/m1 po:noun ts:masculine_singular
baupsen/v0w0G0 po:verb
bëllegen/v0w0G0 po:verb
bëtschelen/v0w0G0 po:verb
billen/v0w0G0 po:verb
Bitzcours/m1 po:noun ts:masculine_singular
bleechen/v0w0G0 po:verb
bloggen/v0w0G0 po:verb
botteren/v0w0G0 po:verb
brëllen/v0x0w0G0 po:verb
broselen/v0w0G0 po:verb
brutzelen/v0w0G0 po:verb
bumssen/v0w0G0 po:verb
chatten/v0w0G0 po:verb
Chimiescours/m1 po:noun ts:masculine_singular
Chineseschcours/m1 po:noun ts:masculine_singular
Cours/m1 po:noun ts:masculine_singular
cracken/v0w0G0 po:verb
daachen/v0w0G0 po:verb
Daarmbakteerie/m2 po:noun ts:feminine_singular
Daarmbakterie/m2 po:noun ts:feminine_singular
Däitschcours/m1 po:noun ts:masculine_singular
Danzcours/m1 po:noun ts:masculine_singular
dausend/b0a0z3 po:adjective
deefen/v0w0G0 po:verb
deiten/v0w0G0 po:verb
Dictiounscours/m1 po:noun ts:masculine_singular
dimmeren/v2G0 po:verb
dobäifügen/v1t0g0 po:verb
drafachen/v0t0g0 po:verb
drängen/v0w0G0 po:verb
driften/v0w0G0 po:verb
dübelen/v0w0G0 po:verb
duerchblécken/v0t0g0 po:verb
duschen/v0w0G0 po:verb
Eethikcours/m1 po:noun ts:masculine_singular
Ekonomiescours/m1 po:noun ts:masculine_singular
ëmdeefen/v0t0g0 po:verb
ëmrëschten/v0t0g0 po:verb
ëmwandelen/v0t0g0 po:verb
Engleschcours/m1 po:noun ts:masculine_singular
entgéintkucken/v0t0g0 po:verb
eralauschteren/v0t0g0 po:verb
erarëtschen/v0t0g0 po:verb
eraschleideren/v0t0g0 po:verb
erauskéieren/v0t0X0g1g0 po:verb
erausrëtschen/v0t0g0 po:verb
erausschleideren/v0t0g0 po:verb
erawielen/v0t0g0 po:verb
erëmfuerderen/v0t0g0 po:verb
erofbonzelen/v0t0g0 po:verb
erofrutschen/v0t0g0 po:verb
eropschaffen/v0t0g0 po:verb
Ersatzenseignant/f8m1 po:noun ts:masculine_singular
Ethikcours/m1 po:noun ts:masculine_singular
ewechbotzen/v0t0g0 po:verb
ewechschécken/v0t0g0 po:verb
Exreliounsenseignant/f8m1 po:noun ts:masculine_singular
fachsimpelen/v0w0G0 po:verb
fécken/v0w0G0 po:verb
fesselen/v0w0G0 po:verb
festklammeren/g0 po:verb
Finneschcours/m1 po:noun ts:masculine_singular
flashen/v0w0G0 po:verb
flirten/v0w0G0 po:verb
Formatiounscours/m1 po:noun ts:masculine_singular
foulen/v0w0G0 po:verb
Franséischcours/m1 po:noun ts:masculine_singular
Frontalcours/m1 po:noun ts:masculine_singular
frupsen/v0w0G0 po:verb
fuerzen/v0w0G0 po:verb
futtischaffen/v0t0g0 po:verb
gackeren/v0w0G0 po:verb
gäipen/v0w0G0 po:verb
garrelen/v0w0G0 po:verb
Geographiescours/m1 po:noun ts:masculine_singular
Geschäftsclient/f8s0m1 po:noun ts:masculine_singular
Geschichtsenseignant/f8m1 po:noun ts:masculine_singular
gëschten/v0w0G0 po:verb
glëschten/v0w0G0 po:verb
graatschen/v0w0G0 po:verb
Grondschoulenseignant/f8m1 po:noun ts:masculine_singular
grunschen/v0w0G0 po:verb
haen/v3w0G0 po:verb
hanneschtschécken/v0t0g0 po:verb
Hauscours/m1 po:noun ts:masculine_singular
heekelen/v0w0G0 po:verb
heften/v0w0G0 po:verb
hexen/v0w0G0 po:verb
hikucken/v0t0g0 po:verb
Hindicours/m1 po:noun ts:masculine_singular
honnert/b0a0z3 po:adjective
hypen/v0w0G0 po:verb
Idocours/m1 po:noun ts:masculine_singular
Internetcours/m1 po:noun ts:masculine_singular
Italieeneschcours/m1 po:noun ts:masculine_singular
iwwertakten/v0t0g0 po:verb
jazzen/v0w0G0 po:verb
Jiddeschcours/m1 po:noun ts:masculine_singular
kacken/v0w0G0 po:verb
Kambacours/m1 po:noun ts:masculine_singular
kasteien/v0w0G0 po:verb
kéimen/v0w0G0 po:verb
kickelen/v0w0G0 po:verb
klaatschen/v0w0G0 po:verb
klappen/v0w0G0 po:verb
klirren/v0w0G0 po:verb
knisteren/v0w0G0 po:verb
Kolibakteerie/m2 po:noun ts:feminine_singular
Kolibakterie/m2 po:noun ts:feminine_singular
Kompositiounscours/m1 po:noun ts:masculine_singular
Konschtgeschichtscours/m1 po:noun ts:masculine_singular
krichen/v0w0G0 po:verb
laberen/v0w0G0 po:verb
lassklappen/v0t0g0 po:verb
Laténgeschcours/m1 po:noun ts:masculine_singular
latzen/v0w0G0 po:verb
Lëtzebuergeschcours/m1 po:noun ts:masculine_singular
Literaturcours/m1 po:noun ts:masculine_singular
loggen/v0w0G0 po:verb
Mathematikscours/m1 po:noun ts:masculine_singular
matkämpfen/v0t0g0 po:verb
matzidderen/v0t0g0 po:verb
meeschteren/v0w0G0 po:verb
Moralcours/m1 po:noun ts:masculine_singular
mouerzen/v0w0G0 po:verb
Museksenseignant/f8m1 po:noun ts:masculine_singular
nofroen/v3t0o0g0 po:verb
Nonresident/f6m1 po:noun ts:masculine_singular
norëtschen/v0t0g0 po:verb
nowierken/v0t0g0 po:verb
ofbremsen/v0t0g0 po:verb
ofdrëpsen/v0t0g0 po:verb
ofgrenzen/v0t0x0g0 po:verb
ofknipsen/v0t0g0 po:verb
ofliichten/v0t0g0 po:verb
ofrëtschen/v0t0g0 po:verb
ofseelen/v0t0g0 po:verb
ofspueren/v0t0g0 po:verb
ofwielen/v0t0g0 po:verb
ofwimmelen/v0t0g0 po:verb
Onlinecours/m1 po:noun ts:masculine_singular
opbotzen/v0t0g0 po:verb
opfroen/v3t0o0g0 po:verb
opkämmen/v0t0g0 po:verb
oplaueren/v0t0g0 po:verb
opreegen/v0t0x0g0 po:verb
opstëppelen/v0t0g0 po:verb
opwullen/v0t0g0 po:verb
Orthographiescours/m1 po:noun ts:masculine_singular
Paschtuneschcours/m1 po:noun ts:masculine_singular
patchen/v0w0G0 po:verb
Perseschcours/m1 po:noun ts:masculine_singular
Pianoscours/m1 po:noun ts:masculine_singular
Polneschcours/m1 po:noun ts:masculine_singular
posten/v0w0G0 po:verb
Privatclient/f8s0m1 po:noun ts:masculine_singular
Psychologiecours/m1 po:noun ts:masculine_singular
raffen/v0w0G0 po:verb
rakucken/v0t0g0 po:verb
rapassen/v0t0g0 po:verb
rausdämpen/v0t0g0 po:verb
rausrutschen/v0t0g0 po:verb
raven/v0w0G0 po:verb
rawoen/v0t0g0 po:verb
Referenzcours/m1 po:noun ts:masculine_singular
Reliounscours/m1 po:noun ts:masculine_singular
Remis/m1 po:noun ts:masculine_singular
Representant/f6f8m1 po:noun ts:masculine_singular
rëtschen/v0w0G0 po:verb
Romaneschcours/m1 po:noun ts:masculine_singular
Russeschcours/m1 po:noun ts:masculine_singular
scannen/v0w0G0 po:verb
schleideren/v0w0G0 po:verb
Schnuppercours/m1 po:noun ts:masculine_singular
schuckelen/v0w0G0 po:verb
Schwammcours/m1 po:noun ts:masculine_singular
Schweedeschcours/m1 po:noun ts:masculine_singular
Selbstbehaaptungscours/m1 po:noun ts:masculine_singular
senken/v0w0G0 po:verb
sonnen/v0w0G0 po:verb
Sonnerrepresentant/f6f8m1 po:noun ts:masculine_singular
Sproochecours/m1 po:noun ts:masculine_singular
sproochen/v0w0G0 po:verb
Stammclient/f8s0m1 po:noun ts:masculine_singular
Studie/m2 po:noun ts:feminine_singular
surfen/v0w0G0 po:verb
Syreschcours/m1 po:noun ts:masculine_singular
Tauchcours/m1 po:noun ts:masculine_singular
Theatercours/m1 po:noun ts:masculine_singular
Tierkeschcours/m1 po:noun ts:masculine_singular
trätschen/v0w0G0 po:verb
trounen/v0w0G0 po:verb
ubillen/v0t0g0 po:verb
uglotzen/v0t0g0 po:verb
uknipsen/v0t0g0 po:verb
Ukraineschcours/m1 po:noun ts:masculine_singular
Usbeekeschcours/m1 po:noun ts:masculine_singular
useelen/v0t0g0 po:verb
Vëloscours/m1 po:noun ts:masculine_singular
virbeugen/v0t0g0 po:verb
vrecken/v0w0G0 po:verb
Waassergymnastikcours/m1 po:noun ts:masculine_singular
Waffecours/m1 po:noun ts:masculine_singular
wechrutschen/v0t0g0 po:verb
Weiderbildungscours/m1 po:noun ts:masculine_singular
wënnen/v0w0G0 po:verb
wieren/v0w0G0 po:verb
winnen/v0w0G0 po:verb
wuppen/v0w0G0 po:verb
Yogacours/m1 po:noun ts:masculine_singular
zeréckdrängen/v0t0g0 po:verb
zeréckwënschen/v0t0g0 po:verb
zesummewierken/v0t0g0 po:verb
zouwanderen/v0t0g0 po:verb
zréckschécken/v0t0g0 po:verb
zwacken/v0w0G0 po:verb
